Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.300

Foreign branch banks.

A branch of any foreign bank or banker actually and publicly engaged in banking in this state on March 10, 1917, in full compliance with the laws hereof, which were in force immediately prior to March 10, 1917, and which branch has a capital not less in amount than that required for the organization of a state bank as provided in this title at the time and place when and where such branch was established, may continue its said business, subject to all of the regulations and supervision provided for banks. The amount upon which it pays taxes shall be prima facie evidence of the amount and existence of such capital. No such bank or banker shall set forth on its or his or her stationery or in any manner advertise in this state a greater capital, surplus and undivided profits than are actually maintained at such branch. Every foreign corporation, bank and banker, and every officer, agent, and employee thereof who violates any provision of this section or which violates the terms of the resolution filed as required by *RCW 30.04.290 shall for each violation forfeit and pay to the state of Washington the sum of one thousand dollars. A civil action for the recovery of any such sum may be brought by the attorney general in the name of the state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 745; 1955 c 33 s 30.04.300. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 41; RRS s 3248. Formerly RCW 30.04.300.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.04.290 was repealed by 1994 c 256 s 124, without cognizance of its amendment by 1994 c 92 s 27. It has been decodified for publication purposes pursuant to RCW 1.12.025. RCW 30.04.290 was subsequently repealed by 1997 c 101 s 7.